Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 51. VOTER REGISTRATION.
§ 10. Transfer and change of status.

Upon a change of legal residence within the county, or a change of name, any registered voter may cause his or her registration to be transferred to his or her new address or new name by completing and mailing a federal or state mail voter registration application form, by updating his or her address at the Office of Driver Services, any state revenue office, public assistance agency, disabilities agency, or other voter registration agency, by signing a mailed request to the permanent registrar, giving his or her present address and the address at which he or she was last registered or his or her present name and the name under which he or she was last registered, or by applying in person at the office of the permanent registrar.

Upon a change of legal residence from one (1) county within the state to another county within the state, any registered voter may cause his or her registration to be transferred to the new county at his or her new address by:

Completing and mailing a federal or state mail voter registration application form;

Updating his or her new address at a voter registration agency, including without limitation the Office of Driver Services or a state revenue office, public assistance agency, or disabilities agency;

Signing a mailed request to the permanent registrar giving the voter's present address and the address at which the voter was last registered; or

Applying in person for the transfer at the office of the permanent registrar.

If the updated registration information is actually received in the office of the county clerk of the voter's new county not later than four (4) days before a scheduled election, the voter shall have the right to vote in the scheduled election in the precinct into which the voter just moved in the new county.

If the updated registration information is not actually received by the fourth day before a scheduled election, the voter shall not be eligible to vote in the scheduled election.

If the change of legal residence is made pursuant to subsection (a) or subdivision (d)(1) of this section during the thirty-day administrative cut-off period immediately prior to any election scheduled within the county, the registered voter shall retain his or her right to vote in the scheduled election in the precinct to which he or she just moved.

The permanent registrar shall conduct a uniform, nondiscriminatory address confirmation program during each odd-numbered year to ensure that voter registration lists are accurate and current. The address confirmation program shall be completed not later than ninety (90) days prior to a primary or general election for federal office. Based on change of address data received from the United States Postal Service or its licensees, or other unconfirmed data indicating that a registered voter no longer resides at his or her registered address, the permanent registrar shall send a forwardable address confirmation notice, including a postage-paid and preaddressed return card, to enable the voter to verify or correct the address information.

If change of address data indicate that the voter has moved to a new residence address in the same county and, if the county is divided into more than one (1) congressional district, the same congressional district, the address confirmation notice shall contain the following statement:

If the change of address data indicates that the voter has moved to a new address in another county or, if a county is divided into more than one (1) congressional district, to a new address in the same county but in a new congressional district, the notice shall include the following statement:

The county clerk may send out an address confirmation to any voter when he or she receives unconfirmed information that the voter no longer resides at the address on the voter registration records. The county clerk shall follow the same confirmation procedure as set forth in subsection (d) of this section.

Based on change of address information received pursuant to subsections (a) and (d) of this section, the permanent registrar shall:

Update and correct the voter's registration if the information indicates that the voter has moved to a new address within the same county and the same congressional district;

Designate the voter as inactive if the information indicates the voter has moved to a new address in another county or to a new address in another congressional district in the same county or if the address confirmation notices have been returned as undeliverable; or

Cancel the voter registration in the county from which the voter has moved if the voter verifies in writing that he or she has moved to a residence address in another county. [As amended by Acts 1977, No. 882, § 1; 1991, No. 581, § 1; 1995, No. 947, § 6; 1995, No. 964, § 6; 1999, No. 1108, § 1; 2007, No. 560, § 1; 2009, No. 659, § 3.]

“We have received notification that you have moved to a new address in __________________ County (or in the __________________ Congressional District). We will reregister you at your new address unless, within ten (10) days, you notify us that your change of address is not a change of your permanent residence. You may notify us by returning the attached postage-paid postcard or by calling (__________) __________-__________. If this is not a permanent change of residence and if you do not notify us within ten (10) days you may be required to update your residence address in order to vote at future elections.”

“We have received notification that you have moved to a new address not in __________________ County (or not in the __________________ Congressional District). If you no longer live in __________________ County (or in the __________________ Congressional District), you must transfer your registration to your new residence address in order to vote in the next election. If you are still an Arkansas resident, you may obtain a form to transfer your registration by calling your county clerk's office or the Secretary of State. If your change of address is not a change of your permanent residence, you must return the attached postage-paid postcard. If you do not return this card and continue to reside in __________________ County (and in the __________________ Congressional District), you may be required to provide identification and update your residence address in order to vote at future elections, and if you do not vote at any election in the period between the date of this notice and the second federal general election after the date of this notice, your voter registration will be cancelled and you will have to reregister in order to vote. If the change of address is permanent, please return the attached postage-paid postcard which will assist us in keeping our voter registration records accurate.”

Legislative Amendments.

The 1977 amendment, in subsection (a), inserted the third sentence and, in the last sentence, deleted the word “promptly” preceding “shall make” and added the words “as outlined above”.

The 1991 amendment inserted “pursuant to subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section” in (a); added present (b) and (c); and redesignated former (b) and (c) as present (d) and (e).

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

The 1999 amendment inserted (d) [now (e)] and redesignated former (d) as (e) [now (f)].

The 2007 amendment inserted (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in the statement in (d)(2), substituted “transfer your registration to” for “reregister at” in the second sentence and “transfer your registration” for “register to vote” in the third sentence; updated internal references; and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted “actually” in
(b)(2)(A); substituted “not actually received by the fourth day” for “received less than four days” in (b)(2)(B); and corrected an erroneous subsection designation in (f).

§ 11. Cancellation of registration.

It shall be the duty of the permanent registrar to cancel the registration of voters:

Who have failed to respond to address confirmation mailings described in section 10 of this amendment and have not voted or appeared to vote in an election during the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the date of the second general election for federal office that occurs after the date of the address confirmation notice;

Who have changed their residence to an address outside the county;

Who have died;

Who have been convicted of a felony and have not discharged their sentence or been pardoned;

Who are not lawfully qualified or registered electors of this state or of the county; or

Who have been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction.

It shall be the duty of the permanent registrar of each county upon the registration of a person who has been registered previously in another county or state to notify promptly the permanent registrar of such other county or state of the new registration.

It shall be the duty of the State Registrar of Vital Records to notify promptly the Secretary of State of the death of all residents of this state.

The Secretary of State shall compile a listing of the deceased residents of this state and shall promptly provide this listing to the permanent registrar of each county.

The deceased voter registration shall be cancelled by the permanent registrar.

It shall be the duty of the circuit clerk of each county upon the conviction of any person of a felony to notify promptly the permanent registrar of the county of residence of such convicted felon.

It is the duty of any convicted felon who desires to register to vote to provide the county clerk with proof from the appropriate state or local agency, or office that the felon has been discharged from probation or parole, has paid all probation or parole fees, or has satisfied all terms of imprisonment, and paid all applicable court costs, fines, or restitution.

Proof that the felon has been discharged from probation or parole, paid all probation or parole fees, or satisfied all terms of imprisonment, and paid all applicable court costs, fines, or restitution shall be provided to the felon after completion of the probation, parole, or sentence by the Department of Correction, the Department of Community Correction, the appropriate probation office or the circuit clerk as applicable.

The circuit clerk or any other entity responsible for collection shall provide proof to the Department of Correction, the Department of Community Correction, or the appropriate probation office that the felon has paid all applicable court costs, fines, or restitution.

Upon compliance with subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section, the felon shall be deemed eligible to vote.

If upon inquiry an individual is found by a court to be unfit and disqualified to act as a grand or petit juror because the person is not a citizen of the United States:

The name of the individual shall be put aside and not used; and

A notation of the dismissal of the name and reason for dismissal of the name shall be made in the jury book.

The circuit clerk shall promptly notify the permanent registrar of the county of residence of an individual who is disqualified from serving as a juror under subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section.

After receiving the notice from the circuit clerk, the permanent registrar shall promptly cancel the dismissed juror's voter registration, update the voter registry, and send the dismissed juror notice under subsection (f) of this section.

It is the duty of any person whose registration has been cancelled under subsection (e) of this section to provide the permanent registrar with proof from the appropriate federal, state, or local agency that he or she is a citizen of the United States.

Upon complying with subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section the person shall be deemed eligible to vote and the permanent registrar shall add the citizen to the voter registry upon the citizen's application for voter registration.

Within ten (10) days following the receipt or possession of information requiring any cancellation of registration, other than under section 11(a)(1) of this amendment, the permanent registrar shall cancel the registration, note the date of the cancellation, the reason for the cancellation, and the person cancelling the registration.

The permanent registrar shall, thirty (30) days before cancellation, notify all persons whose registration records are to be cancelled in accordance with section 11(a)(1) of this amendment. The notice may be either by publication or by first class mail. The notice by mail shall be as follows:

When, in response to the notice, a qualified voter requests the permanent registrar not to cancel the voter registration, the voter registration shall not be cancelled under section 11(a)(1) of this amendment.

The permanent registrar is authorized, and may be directed by the county board of registration, to determine by mail check, house to house canvass, or any other reasonable means at any time within the whole or any part of the county whether active record registration files contain the names of any persons not qualified by law to vote. Further, upon application based upon affidavits of one (1) or more qualified voters by the prosecuting attorney for the county, the circuit judge of the county, for good cause shown, may order the permanent registrar to make sure determination or to cancel the registration of such unqualified persons. [As amended by Acts 1977, No. 744, § 1; 1983, No. 11, § 1; 1987, No. 800, § 1; 1991, No. 581, § 2; 1995, No. 947, § 7; 1995, No. 964, § 7; 2001, No. 560, § 1; 2003, No. 271, § 1; 2003, No. 375, § 1; 2003, No. 1451, § 1; 2009, No. 659, § 4; 2019, No. 290, § 1.]

“NOTICE OF IMPENDING CANCELLATION OF VOTER REGISTRATION.

According to our records you have not responded to our address confirmation notice and you have not voted in any election during the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the date of the second general election for federal office after the date of the first notice. This may indicate that you no longer live at the residence address printed on the postcard. If your permanent residence address is still the same as the printed address on this postcard YOU MUST CONFIRM YOUR RESIDENCE ADDRESS in order to remain on the voter registration list. If you do not return the attached postcard within thirty (30) days after the date postmarked on this card YOUR REGISTRATION WILL BE CANCELLED and you will have to re-register to vote.”

Publisher's Notes.

This section was amended by two 1987 acts which conflict and cannot be codified together. Acts 1987, No. 800, was the last-enacted amendment and is set out above. Acts 1987, No. 597, § 1, would have amended subsections (a) and (f) to read as follows:

“(a)

It shall be the duty of the Permanent Registrar to cancel the registration of voters:

“(1)

Who have failed to vote in any election during four (4) successive calendar years immediately preceding the first of January of any year. Provided, the registration of a person who is in the active military service of the United States shall be cancelled for failure to vote only if such person has failed to vote in any election during six (6) successive calendar years immediately preceding the first of January of any year;

“(2)

Who have changed their residence to an address outside the county;

“(3)

Who have died or changed their name;

“(4)

Who have been convicted of felonies and have not discharged their sentence or been pardoned; or

“(5)

Who are not lawfully qualified or registered electors of this State, or of the county.

“(f)

The Permanent Registrar may send all persons whose Affidavits of Registration are cancelled in accordance with Section 11(a)(1) of this amendment the following notice by first-class mail within ten (10) days after such cancellation: ‘NOTICE OF CANCELLATION OF VOTER REGISTRATION. Notice is hereby given that due to your failure to vote in any election in this county during the preceding four (4) calendar years, (six (6) calendar years in the case of persons in active military service of the United States) under the laws of this State your voter registration has been cancelled. If you are still a qualified voter, you may register again at any time.’ Alternatively, the Permanent Registrar may publish a list of the names of all persons whose Affidavits of Registration are cancelled in the previous calendar year in accordance with Section 11(a)(1) of this amendment on or before the 31st day of January of each year in a legal newspaper. To assure proper identification, the name of the person's street or route and the name of the city, town, or community in which the person lives shall be included. The following notice shall be given and shall be followed by the list of names: ‘NOTICE OF CANCELLATION OF VOTER REGISTRATION. Notice is hereby given that due to your failure to vote in any election in this county during the preceding four (4) calendar years, (six (6) calendar years in case of persons in active military service of the United States) under the laws of this State your voter registration has been cancelled. If you are still a qualified voter, you may register again at any time.’”

Legislative Amendments.

The 1991 amendment in (a)(1) substituted “year” for “years” and deleted “[year] and have not responded to the notice prescribed by Section 11(f) of this Amendment” from the end; and added (a)(6).

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

The 2001 amendment redesignated former (d) as (d)(1) and added (d)(2).

The 2003 amendment by No. 271, in (d)(2)(A)(ii), substituted “state or local government agency” for “probation office”, “probation or parole and paid all probation or parole fees or” for “probation, paid all probation fees, and”, and “plus” for “and”; inserted present (d)(2)(B); and redesignated former (d)(2)(B) as present (d)(2)(C).

The 2003 amendment by No. 375 redesignated former (c) as (c)(1) and substituted “the Secretary of State of the death of all residents of this state” for “the permanent registrar in each county of the death of all residents of such county”; and added (c)(2).

The 2003 amendment by No. 1451 rewrote (d)(2)(A); inserted present (d)(2)(B) and (d)(2)(C); and redesignated former (d)(2)(B) as present (d)(2)(D).

The 2009 amendment substituted “a felony” for “felonies” in (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment inserted (e) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

§ 12. Loss or destruction of voter registration records.

In the event any Registration Record or File shall become lost or destroyed, the Permanent Registrar shall prepare, from the remaining Files, temporary copies of the registration records if necessary for the conduct of any election. The Permanent Registrar shall send notice of such fact by first-class mail to any voter whose registration record has been lost, destroyed or mutilated in order that such voter may register again. The previous registration shall be cancelled at the time of the new registration, and in any event within sixty (60) days after mailing of such notice. [As amended by Acts 1995, No. 947, § 9; 1995, No. 964, § 9.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

§ 13. Fail-safe voting — Verification of voter registration.

If a voter presents himself or herself at a polling place on the date of an election but no record of his or her voter registration can be located by the judges of the election on the precinct voter registration list, the voter shall be permitted to vote only under the conditions set forth in § 7-5-306 or § 7-7-308.

In order to determine that all who cast a ballot in an election, a runoff election, or a school election in this state are legally qualified to vote in that election, each voter shall verify his or her registration by:

Presenting to the election official when appearing to vote in person either early or at the polls on election day in an election, a runoff election, or a school election verification of registration in the form of a document or identification card that:

Shows the name of the person to whom the document or identification card was issued;

Shows a photograph of the person to whom the document or identification card was issued;

Is issued by the United States, the State of Arkansas, or an accredited postsecondary educational institution in the State of Arkansas; and

If displaying an expiration date, is not expired or expired no more than four (4) years before the date of the election in which the voter seeks to vote; or

Submitting with an absentee ballot in an election, a runoff election, or a school election a copy of a document or identification card that complies with the requirements of subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i) of this section.

A document or identification card may be presented in a digital format on an electronic device if the document or identification card:

The digital format has been approved or issued by the United States, the State of Arkansas, or an accredited postsecondary educational institution in the State of Arkansas.

A driver's license;

A photo identification card;

A concealed handgun carry license;

A United States passport;

An employee badge or identification document issued by an accredited postsecondary educational institution in the State of Arkansas;

A United States military identification document;

A public assistance identification card if the card shows a photograph of the person to whom the document or identification card was issued; and

A voter verification card under Arkansas Code § 7-5-324.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(B) of this section, if a voter voting by absentee ballot fails to submit with the ballot documentation that complies with subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii) of this section, the absentee ballot shall be considered a provisional ballot.

The following persons shall not be required to submit with his or her absentee ballot documentation that complies with subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii) of this section:

An active duty member of the uniformed services of the United States or United States Merchant Marine who is absent from the country on election day because of his or her service;

The spouse or dependant of an active duty member of the uniformed services of the United States or United States Merchant Marine under subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i) of this section who is absent from the country on election day because of the service of the member; or

A resident of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state of Arkansas.

A person not required to submit a document or identification card under subdivision (b)(3)(B)(iii)(a) of this section shall provide documentation from the administrator of the facility attesting that the person is a resident of the facility.

A provisional ballot cast by a voter who did not present a required document or identification card shall be counted if:

The voter completes a sworn statement at the polling site when voting either early or at the polls on election day stating that the voter is registered to vote in this state and that he or she is the person registered to vote.

A sworn statement completed under subdivision (b)(4)(A)(i)(a) of this section is not required to be notarized but the voter shall execute the sworn statement under penalty of perjury.

A sworn statement completed at the polling site shall be delivered to the county board of election commissioners so that the provisional ballot may be counted; and

The county board of election commissioners does not determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted based on other grounds; or

The voter returns to the county board of election commissioners or the county clerk by 12:00 noon on the Monday following the election and presents a document or identification card that complies with the requirements of subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i) of this section; and

The county board of election commissioners does not determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted based on other grounds.

A provisional ballot cast by an absentee voter who failed to submit with an absentee ballot documentation that complies with subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii) of this section shall be counted if:

The voter completes and returns the sworn statement portion of the absentee ballot form stating that the voter is registered to vote in this state and that he or she is the person registered to vote.

A sworn statement returned under subdivision (b)(5)(A)(i)(a) of this section is not required to be notarized but the voter shall execute the sworn statement under penalty of perjury; and

The county board of election commissioners does not determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted based on other grounds; or

The voter returns to the county board of election commissioners or the county clerk by 12:00 noon on the Monday following the election and presents a copy of a document or identification card that complies with the requirements of subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i) of this section; and

The county board of election commissioners does not determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted based on other grounds.

A person registering to vote by mail and who has not previously voted in a federal election in this state shall only be required to comply with § 7-5-201(e).

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall promulgate rules necessary to implement subsection (b) of this section, including without limitation the preparation of a sworn statement to be used by voters who cast a provisional ballot under subsection (b) of this section.

Following each election, the county board of election commissioners may review the precinct voter registration lists and may provide the information of each voter not presenting a document or identification card necessary to verify his or her voter registration when voting in person or by absentee ballot to the prosecuting attorney.

The county board of election commissioners shall refer suspected instances of voter fraud to the prosecuting attorney.

The prosecuting attorney may investigate possible voter fraud.

Upon application based upon affidavits of one (1) or more qualified voters by the appropriate prosecuting attorney alleging possible voter fraud, the appropriate circuit judge, for good cause shown, may order the permanent registrar to cancel the registration of the voter failing to verify his or her registration as provided by this subsection. [As amended by Acts 1973, No. 149, §§ 5, 6; 1995, No. 947, § 10; 1995, No. 964, § 10; 2017, No. 633, § 2; 2019, No. 684, § 1.]

(1)

Complies with the requirements of subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section; and

(C)

Documents and identification cards that comply with the requirements of subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section include without limitation:

(2)
(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section, if a voter is unable to verify his or her registration when voting in person by presenting a document or identification card that complies with subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i) of this section, the election official shall:

(i)

Indicate on the precinct voter registration list that the voter did not present a required document or identification card; and

(ii)

Permit the voter to cast a provisional ballot and inform the voter of the requirements under subdivision (b)(4) of this section.

(B)
(i)

A person who is a resident of a long-term care or residential care facility licensed by the state of Arkansas is not required to verify his or her registration by presenting a document or identification card that complies with subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i) of this section when voting in person.

(ii)

A person not required to present a document or identification card under subdivision (b)(2)(B)(i) of this section shall provide documentation from the administrator of the facility attesting that the person is a resident of the facility.

Legislative Amendments.

The 1973 amendment inserted the words “or previous signature on the Supplement Record of Voting Form” and “or supplement thereto” and deleted “thereon” preceding “are deemed” in subsection (b) and inserted “or Supplement Record of Voting Form” in subsection (e).

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

The 2017 amendment added “Verification of voter registration” in the section heading; designated the existing language as (a); in (a), inserted “or herself” and “or her” and substituted “the voter” for “such voter”; and added (b).

The 2019 amendment inserted (b)(1)(B) and redesignated former (b)(1)(B) as (b)(1)(C); and inserted “Arkansas Code” in (b)(1)(C)(viii).

§ 14. Voter registration lists.

By the first day of June of each year, and at such other times as may be practicable, all Permanent Registrars shall, and at their discretion at other times may, print or otherwise duplicate and publish lists of registered voters by precincts, and may distribute such lists pursuant to §§ 7-5-105 and 7-5-109. A copy of the most current such list in each precinct shall be furnished the election officials at each precinct at the time the ballot boxes are delivered and such election officials shall post said list at a conspicuous place in the polling area.

By the first day of June of each year, the Permanent Registrar shall certify to the Secretary of State the total number of registered voters in the county. The Secretary of State shall tabulate the total number of registered voters in the state and shall make such information available to interested persons upon request. [As amended by Acts 1995, No. 947, § 11; 1995, No. 964, § 11.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964, in (a), substituted “pursuant to §§ 7-5-105 and 7-5-109” for “free of cost, or, with the approval of the County Board of Registration, at a price necessary to cover cost of publication” and made a minor stylistic change; and substituted “Secretary of State” for “State Auditor” twice in (b).

§ 15. Penalties.

Any person who shall maliciously and intentionally destroy, steal, mutilate or unlawfully detain or obtain any voter registration form or any Registration Record Files shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in the sum of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or be imprisoned in the State Penitentiary for a period of not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both.

Any public official or election official who wilfully violates any provision of this amendment shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall also be removed from such office.

Any other person who wilfully violates any provision of this amendment shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [As amended by Acts 1995, No. 947, § 12; 1995, No. 964, § 12.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 substituted “voter registration form” for “Affidavits of Registration” in (a).

§ 16. Severability.

If any provision of this amendment or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the amendment which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this amendment are declared to be severable.

§ 17. Effect on other laws.

This amendment supersedes and repeals the requirement of Amendment No. 8 that a poll tax receipt be presented prior to registration or voting, and further supersedes and repeals Act 19 of 1964 and all other laws or parts of laws in conflict herewith.

§ 18. Appropriations.

The General Assembly shall make such appropriations as may be required for the effectuation of this amendment.

§ 19. Amendment.

The General Assembly may, in the same manner as required for amendment of laws initiated by the people, amend Sections 5 through 15 of this amendment, so long as such amendments are germane to this amendment, and consistent with its policy and purposes.

§ 20. Short title.

This amendment shall be known as the “Arkansas Amendment for Voter Registration without Poll Tax Payment.”